Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:The state patrol, subject to appropriation, must hire a sufficient number of staff to ensure that the toxicology laboratory or laboratories can process submissions for drug and alcohol impairment cases within one week of the time the sample arrives at the laboratory. The chief must submit to the house appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee, in accordance with the office of financial management budget submittal guidelines, the amount necessary to fund the toxicology labs as required in this section.--- END ---